test/src/gt-norm-yamls/proper-smj_gt-norm.yaml
  Propernoun - Ievár: # LONDON-mal
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Ievár
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Ievára
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Ievárav
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Ievárin
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Ievárij
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Ieváris
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Ievárijn
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Ievára
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Ievárijda
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Ievárin
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Ábmut: # LONDON-mal
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Ábmut
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Ábmuda
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Ábmudav
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Ábmudin
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Ábmudij
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Ábmudis
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Ábmudijn
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Ábmuda
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Ábmudijda
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Ábmudin
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Ábmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Listárjjus: # LONDON-mal
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Listárjjus
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Listárjjusa
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Listárjjusav
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Listárjjusin
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Listárjjusij
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Listárjjusis
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Listárjjusijn
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Listárjjusa
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Listárjjusijda
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Listárjjusin
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Kárin: # LONDON-fem
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Kárin
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Kárina
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Kárinav
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Kárinin
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Kárinij
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Kárinis
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Kárinijn
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Kárina
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ill: Kárinijda
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Kárinin
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Adélieednam: # LONDON-plc
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Adélieednam
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Adélieednama
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Adélieednamav
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Adélieednamin
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Adélieednamij
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Adélieednamis
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Adélieednamijn
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Adélieednama
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Adélieednamijda
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Adélieednamin
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Loahpasj: # LONDON-Obj
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Loahpasj
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Loahpatja
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Loahpatjav
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Loahpatjin
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Loahpatjij
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Loahpatjis
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Loahpatjijn
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Loahpatja
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ill: Loahpatjijda
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: Loahpatjin
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Loahpasj+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
#  Propernoun - Jusát: # ANAR-mal
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Jusát
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Jusáda
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Jusádav
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Jusádin
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Jusádij
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Jusádis
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Jusádijn
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Jusáda
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Jusádijda
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Jusádin
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
#    Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Guhttás: # ANAR-plc
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Guhttás
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Guhttása
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Guhttásav
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Guhttásin
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Guhttásij
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Guhttásis
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Guhttásijn
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Guhttása
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Guhttásijda
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Guhttásin
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Mihkal: # DUORTNUS-mal
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Mihkal
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Mihkkala
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Mihkkalav
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Mihkkalin
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Mihkkalij
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Mihkkalis
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Mihkkalijn
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Mihkkala
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Mihkkalijda
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Mihkkalin
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
 
  Propernoun - Vándar: # DUORTNUS-sur
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Vándar
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Vánndara
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Vánndarav
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Vánndarin
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Vánndarij
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Vánndaris
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Vánndarijn
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Vánndara
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ill: Vánndarijda
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Vánndarin
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Euråvpårádeministarjuogos: # DUORTNUS-org
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: [Europarádeministarjuogos, Euråvpårádeministarjuogos        ]
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: [Europarádeministarjuohkusa, Euråvpårádeministarjuohkusa    ]
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: [Europarádeministarjuohkusav,Euråvpårádeministarjuohkusav   ]
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: [Europarádeministarjuohkusin, Euråvpårádeministarjuohkusin  ]
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: [Europarádeministarjuohkusij, Euråvpårádeministarjuohkusij  ]
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: [Europarádeministarjuohkusis, Euråvpårádeministarjuohkusis  ]
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: [Europarádeministarjuohkusijn, Euråvpårádeministarjuohkusijn]
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: [Europarádeministarjuohkusa, Euråvpårádeministarjuohkusa    ]
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill: [Europarádeministarjuohkusijda, Euråvpårádeministarjuohkusijda]
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: [Europarádeministarjuohkusin, Europarádeministarjuogon, Euråvpårádeministarjuohkusin, Euråvpårádeministarjuogon]
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Euråvpårádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Gierisluoppal: # DUORTNUS-plc
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Gierisluoppal
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Gierisluobbala
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Gierisluobbalav
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Gierisluobbalin
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Gierisluobbalij
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Gierisluobbalis
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Gierisluobbalijn
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Gierisluobbala
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Gierisluobbalijda
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Gierisluobbalin
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Gierisluoppal+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Seustiempel: # TIEMPEL-Obj
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Seustiempel
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Seustiemmpela
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Seustiemmpelav
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Seustiemmpelin
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Seustiemmpelij
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Seustiemmpelis
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Seustiemmpelijn
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Seustiemmpela
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ill: Seustiemmpelijda
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: Seustiemmpelin
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Seustiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Euruhpá: # Åvtåstus: # BASUDIS-org
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom': 'Euråvpå Åvtåstus'
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen': 'Euråvpå Åvtåstusá'
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc': 'Euråvpå Åvtåstusáv'
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine': 'Euråvpå Åvtåstusán'
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill': 'Euråvpå Åvtåstussaj'
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela': 'Euråvpå Åvtåstusás'
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com': 'Euråvpå Åvtåstusájn'
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom': 'Euråvpå Åvtåstusá'
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill': 'Euråvpå Åvtåstusájda'
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess': 'Euråvpå Åvtåstussan'
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom': []
    'Euråvpå Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom': []

  Propernoun - Ánndaris: # BASUDIS-mal
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Ánndaris
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Ánndarisá
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Ánndarisáv
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Ánndarisán
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Ánndarissaj
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Ánndarisás
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Ánndarisájn
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Ánndarisá
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Ánndarisájda
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Ánndarissan
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Ulldevis: # BASUDIS-plc
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Ulldevis
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Ulldevisá
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Ulldevisáv
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Ulldevisán
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Ulldevissaj
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Ulldevisás
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Ulldevisájn
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Ulldevisá
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Ulldevisájda
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Ulldevissan
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: ulldevisák
